Utah statutes.
16-6a-118.   Electronic documents.

(1)  Notwithstanding the other requirements of this chapter except subject to Section 16-6a-106, the division may by rule permit a writing required or permitted to be filed with the division under this chapter:

(a)  to be delivered, mailed, or filed:

(i)  in an electronic medium; or

(ii)  by electronic transmission; or

(b)  to be signed by photographic, electronic, or other means prescribed by rule, except that a writing signed in an electronic medium shall be signed by electronic signature in accordance with Title 46, Chapter 4, Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.

(2)  The division may by rule provide for any writing required or permitted to be prepared, delivered, or mailed by the division under this chapter to be prepared, delivered, or mailed:

(a)  in an electronic medium; or

(b)  by electronic transmission.



Amended by Chapter 21, 2006 General Session

